Utah, session 2026, SB216.
Section 1. Section 53H-1-402 is amended to read:53H-1-402Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Reports to and actions of the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee:(a)the reports described in Sections 53H-1-502, 53H-1-503, and 53H-1-504;(b)the reports described in Section 53H-1-203 by the board on:(i)system wide responses to changing demographics and workforce; and(ii)the board's activities and performance against the board's goals and metrics;(c)the report described in Section 53H-5-205;(d)the report described in Section 53H-8-202 by the board on recommended appropriations for higher education institutions and the board, including the report described in Section 53H-11-406 by the board on the effects of offering nonresident partial tuition scholarships;(e)the report described in Section 53H-8-306 by the Department of Workforce Services and the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity on targetedhigh-demand jobs;(f)the reports described in Section 53H-8-303 by the board on performance;(g)the report described in Section 53H-11-402 by the board on the Opportunity Scholarship Program;(h)the report described in Section 53H-13-309 regarding the talent advisory councils;(i)the report described in Section 53H-11-414 by the board on the Utah Promise Program;(j)the report described in Section 53H-6-202 by the board on an institution compensating a student athlete for the use of the student athlete's name, image, or likeness;(k)the report described in Section 53H-1-604 regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council; and(l)the report described in Section 53E-10-308 by the State Board of Education and board on student participation in the concurrent enrollment program.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following occasional report is due to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee: the board's report regarding each institution's strategic reinvestment plan described in Section 53H-8-210.(3)In accordance with applicable provisions, the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall :(a)complete the following:(a)(i)an appropriation recommendation described in Section 53H-1-504 regarding compliance with Subsections 53H-1-504(5) and (14); and(b)(ii)as required by Section 53H-8-304, the review of performance funding described in Section 53H-8-304.; and(b)ensure that all non-statutory performance and growth funding formulas that contribute to appropriations for technical colleges:(i)include equivalent funding value for secondary and adult students; and(ii)reflect the full responsibility of the technical college's statutorily-required services.(4)In consultation with the board, the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall study a re-design of:(a)the performance funding model described in Chapter 8, Part 3, Performance Funding, to better ensure:(i)institutional alignment with the statewide system of higher education and the institution's mission within the statewide system; and(ii)investment in meeting localized and statewide workforce demands and securing post-graduation employment outcomes; and(b)enrollment-based funding, including, for technical colleges, funding distribution models that:(i)include equivalent funding value for secondary and adult students; and(ii)reflect the full responsibility of the technical college's statutorily-required services.(4)The board shall:(a)complete a technical college capacity funding framework study for institutions described in Subsection 53H-3-602(1)(b)(iv) that contemplates:(i)a process for identifying specific technical college programs eligible for state-funded capacity expansion;(ii)identifying, validating, and quantifying, by institution and program, unmet:(A)student demand, including secondary and postsecondary students; and(B)employer demand for graduates;(iii)methodology for establishing the amount and timing of state-funded capacity appropriations, including whether the appropriations are retrospective or prospective;(iv)the availability of alternative funding sources to support capacity expansions;(v)mechanisms for the return of state funds if an institution does not achieve capacity gains; and(vi)how the capacity framework comports with:(A)enrollment funding, as described in Section 53H-8-211; and(B)performance funding, as described in Chapter 8, Part 3, Performance Funding; and(b)report the results of the study described in this Subsection (4), including any corresponding recommendations, to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee before October 1, 2026.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53H-8-202 is amended to read:53H-8-202Effective 07/01/26. Combined requests for appropriations -- Board review of operating budgets -- Submission of budgets -- Recommendations -- Hearing request -- Appropriation formulas -- Allocations -- Dedicated credits -- Financial affairs.(1)As used in this section, "research university" means the University of Utah or Utah State University.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (3), the board shall recommend a combined appropriation for the operating budgets of institutions and the board for inclusion in a state appropriations act.(b)The board's combined budget recommendation shall include:(i)employee compensation;(ii)mandatory costs, including building operations and maintenance, fuel, and power;(iii)performance funding described in Part 3, Performance Funding;(iv)statewide and institutional priorities, including scholarships, financial aid, and technology infrastructure; and(v)enrollment growthfunding described in Section 53H-2-211.(c)The board's recommendations shall be available for presentation to the governor and to the Legislature at least 30 days before the convening of the Legislature, and shall include schedules showing the recommended amounts for each institution and the board, including separately funded programs or divisions.(d)The recommended appropriations shall be determined by the board only after the board has reviewed the proposed institutional operating budgets, and has consulted with the various institutions and board staff in order to make appropriate adjustments.(3)In the combined request for appropriation, the board shall differentiate between appropriations requested for academic education and appropriations requested for technical education.(4)(a)Institutional operating budgets shall be submitted to the board at least 90 days before the convening of the Legislature in accordance with procedures established by the board.(b)Except as provided in Sections 53H-9-604 and 53H-9-504, funding requests pertaining to capital facilities and land purchases shall be submitted in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.(5)(a)The budget recommendations of the board shall be accompanied by full explanations and supporting data.(b)The appropriations recommended by the board shall be made with the dual objective of:(i)justifying for institutions appropriations consistent with the institutions' needs, and consistent with the financial ability of the state; and(ii)determining an equitable distribution of funds among the respective institutions in accordance with the aims and objectives of the statewide master plan for higher education.(6)(a)The board shall request a hearing with the governor on the recommended appropriations.(b)After the governor delivers the governor's budget message to the Legislature, the board shall request hearings on the recommended appropriations with the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(c)If either the total amount of the state appropriations or itsthe allocation of the state appropriations among the institutions as proposed by the Legislature or the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee is substantially different from the recommendations of the board, the board may request further hearings with the Legislature or the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee to reconsider both the total amount and the allocation.(7)The board may devise, establish, periodically review, and revise formulas for the board's use and for the use of the governor and the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee in making appropriation recommendations.(8)(a)The board shall recommend to each session of the Legislature the minimum tuitions, resident and nonresident, for each institution which it considers necessary to implement the budget recommendations.(b)Subject to Subsection (13), the board may fix the tuition, fees, and charges for each institution at levels the board finds necessary to meet budget requirements.(9)Money allocated to each institution by legislative appropriation may be budgeted in accordance with institutional work programs approved by the board, provided that the expenditures funded by appropriations for each institution are kept within the appropriations for the applicable period.(10)The dedicated credits, including revenues derived from tuitions, fees, federal grants, and proceeds from sales received by the institutions are appropriated to the respective institutions to be used in accordance with institutional work programs.(11)An institution may do the institution's own purchasing, issue the institution's own payrolls, and handle the institution's own financial affairs under the general supervision of the board.(12)If the Legislature appropriates money in accordance with this section, the money shall be distributed to the board and institutions to fund the items described in Subsection (2)(b).(13)The board shall create policies requiring an institution of higher education to waive transcript fees for a student who is under the age of 26 years old and:(a)is homeless, as defined in Section 26B-3-207;(b)is a person who is homeless, as defined in Section 35A-5-302;(c)is an individual whose primary nighttime residence is a location that is not designed for or ordinarily used as a sleeping accommodation for an individual;(d)is a homeless child or youth, as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a;(e)is in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services; or(f)was in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services but is no longer in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services due to the individual's age.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53H-8-211 is enacted to read:53H-8-211Effective 07/01/26. Enrollment funding.(1)As used in this section, in alignment with Utah System of Higher Education data collection and reporting taxonomies:(a)(i)"Advanced graduate" means the level of a doctoral course at a degree-granting institution, including a juris doctorate degree.(ii)"Advanced graduate" does not include a course in a medical field for which an institution receives separate funding, including medical, dental, and veterinary programs.(b)"Basic graduate" means the level of a master's course at a degree-granting institution.(c)"Classification of instructional program code" means a coding designation that facilitates the organization, collection, and reporting of fields of study and program completions that the National Center for Education Statistics develops.(d)"Full-time equivalent" means a metric that measures student course load by converting course hours into a number representing a full-time student equivalent load.(e)"High-cost upper-division" means an upper-division course in a program with a classification of instruction program code of 11, 14, 51, or 52.(f)"Level of instruction" means the following instructional or course categories:(i)technical certificate education;(ii)vocational education;(iii)lower-division;(iv)upper-division;(v)high-cost upper-division;(vi)basic graduate; and(vii)advanced graduate.(g)"Lower-division" means the level of a course that:(i)students typically complete within the first two years or 60 credits of education at a degree-granting institution; or(ii)fulfills a requirement for an associate degree.(h)"Technical certificate education" means technical education that a technical college provides to students who are seeking a certificate, continuing occupational education, or enrolled as a secondary student.(i)(i)"Upper-division" means the level of a course that:(A)is an advanced undergraduate course at a degree-granting institution; and(B)students typically complete in the last two years of a bachelor's degree.(ii)"Upper-division" includes major-specific courses.(j)"Vocational education" means career and technical education that a degree-granting institution provides.(2)In accordance with this section, the Legislature shall, as part of the higher education appropriations budget process, annually determine the change in the amount of enrollment funding for each:(a)degree-granting institution; and(b)technical college.(3)(a)The Legislature shall determine the change in the amount of an institution's enrollment funding based on the positive or negative change in enrollment at the institution by:(i)calculating the average direct instructional cost per budget-related full-time equivalent at each level of instruction on a system-wide basis;(ii)calculating the five-year average full-time equivalent budget-related resident enrollment at each level of instruction at each institution for the five-year period ending with the previous fiscal year and the five-year period ending with the year before the previous fiscal year;(iii)calculating the percentage change between each five-year period described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii) by each level of instruction;(iv)if the percent change in enrollment is greater than or equal to a 1% increase or decrease, multiplying the average cost per full-time equivalent by the actual change in full-time equivalent;(v)applying a state cost-sharing weight based on institution type in accordance with Subsection (3)(b); and(vi)summing the amounts for the institution.(b)The Legislature shall apply the following state cost-sharing weights in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(v), representing the percentage of the average cost per full-time equivalent described in Subsection (3)(a) that the state funds:(i)for a research university described in Subsection 53H-3-602(1)(b)(i), 50%;(ii)for a regional university described in Subsection 53H-3-602(1)(b)(ii):(A)except as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(ii)(B), 60%; or(B)for a regional university that does not increase lower-division combined tuition and general fees from the previous year, 65%;(iii)for a community college described in Subsection 53H-3-602(1)(b)(iii), 75%; and(iv)for a technical college, 90%.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53H-8-301 is amended to read:53H-8-301Effective 07/01/26. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Account" means the Performance Funding Restricted Account created in Section 53H-8-302.(2)"Award" means a degree or certificate that an institution grants.(3)"Cohort" means a group of students, defined by the year in which the group enrolls in an institution.(2)(4)"Estimated revenue growth from targeted jobs" means the estimated increase in individual income tax revenue generated by individuals employed in targeted jobs, determined in accordance with Sections 53H-8-302 and 53H-8-306.(3)(5)"Full new performance funding amount" means the maximum amount of new performance funding that an institution may qualify for in a fiscal year, determined by the Legislature in accordance with Section 53H-8-303.(4)(6)"Full-time" means the number of credit hours the board determines is full-time enrollment for a student. (7)"High-demand" job means:(a)a targeted job; and(b)a strategically important occupation that the board identifies in accordance with Subsection 53H-8-303(2).(5)(8)"New performance funding" means the difference between the total amount of money in the account and the amount of money appropriated from the account for performance funding in the current fiscal year.(6)(9)"Performance" means total performance across the metrics described in Section 53H-8-304.(10)"Strategically important occupation" means an occupation that:(a)is not a targeted job; and(b)supports strategic objectives for state workforce development in core public services or emerging industries.(7)(11)"Targeted job" means a four- and five-star job that requires postsecondary training as designated by the Department of Workforce Services.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53H-8-304 is amended to read:53H-8-304Effective 07/01/26. Performance metrics for institutions -- Determination of performance.(1)(a)(i)The board shall establish a model for determining an institution's performance.(ii)The board shall:(A)set a five-year goal for the Utah System of Higher Education for each metric described in Subsection (2)(a);(B)adopt five-year goals for each institution that align with each goal described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A); and(C)ensure the goals the board adopts for each institution described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) are sufficiently rigorous to meet the goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A); and(D)set a five-year goal for each institution for each metric described in Subsection (2)(b).(b)(i)The board shall submit a draft of the model described in this section to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee and the governor for comments and recommendations.(ii)Every five years, the board shall:(A)submit the model described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) and the goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee and to the governor for comments and recommendations; and(B)consider the comments and recommendations described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(A), and make any necessary changes to the model described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) and the goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii).(c)Every five years, the Executive Appropriations Committee, :(i)the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee, and the Education Interim Committee shall prepare and jointly meet to consider  shall make recommendations to the Executive Appropriations Committee regarding legislation for introduction at the following general legislative session to adopt the goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii).; and(ii)the Executive Appropriations Committee shall approve or modify the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee's recommendations described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).(d)After the release of the Department of Workforce Services' bi-annual long-term occupational projections:(i)the board may identify up to five strategically important occupations for degree-granting institutions and five strategically important occupations for technical colleges that:(A)the Talent, Education, and Industry Alignment Board created in Section 53H-13-302 recommends to the board; and(B)the board approves;(ii)if a strategically important occupation described in Subsection (1)(d)(i) becomes a targeted job, the board may identify another strategically important occupation in accordance with the limit described in Subsection (1)(d)(i); and(iii)if a job no longer constitutes a high-demand job, either because the board de-selects a strategically important occupation in favor of a different occupation or because a job is no longer a targeted job, the job shall remain a factor for performance funding calculations in relation to the students who were enrolled in the given program at the time the job most recently constituted a high-demand job.(2)(a)TheFor the five-year performance period beginning on July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2027, the board shall set the goals and establish the performance model described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) for the following metrics:(i)access;(ii)timely completion; and(iii)high-yield awards.(b)For the five-year performance period beginning on July 1, 2027, and ending on June 30, 2032, the board shall establish the performance model described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) and set the goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(D) for the following metrics:(i)for each institution:(A)responsiveness to workforce needs, measured by degrees and certificates the institution awarded that map to high-demand jobs in the state; and(B)institutional efficiency, measured by degrees and certificates the institution awarded per full-time equivalent student;(ii)for each degree-granting institution:(A)the metrics described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and(B)timely completion, meaning the percentage of a cohort that completes an award within 150% of the time in which a student typically completes the award at full-time status, measured by awards granted;(iii)for each regional university and community college described in Subsections 53H-3-602(1)(b)(ii) and 53G-3-602(1)(b)(iii):(A)the metrics described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and(B)the number of students achieving the student's first 30 credit hours;(iv)for each research university described in Subsection 53H-3-602(1)(b)(iv):(A)the metrics described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and(B)the total number of research dollars the university expended; and(v)for each technical college:(A)the metrics described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and(B)placement rates of graduates into employment or degree-granting programs.(b)(3)The board shall :(a)determine the relative weights of the metrics described in and in accordance with Subsection (2)(a).(2);(c)(b)The board shall determine and establish in board policy, the definitions, measures, and relative weights of the metrics described in Subsection (2)(a)(2) based on each institution's mission.; and(c)for a definition of credit hours eligible for meeting the 30-hour threshold for the metric described in Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(B), include a student's concurrent enrollment credits and other credits for prior learning the student has earned.(3)(a)For each degree-granting institution, the board shall annually determine the degree-granting institution's:(i)performance; and(ii)change in performance compared to the degree-granting institution's average performance over the previous five years.(b)(4)For each institution, the board shall annually:(i)(a)adopt annual performance goals for each metric described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) that will(2) that are sufficiently rigorous to advance the institution toward achievement of the five-year goals described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii);(ii)(b)evaluate performance in meeting the goals described in Subsection (3)(b)(i)(4)(a); and(iii)(c)include a degree-granting institution's or technical college's performance under this section in the evaluation described in Subsection 53H-1-203(2)(i).(4)(5)The board shall use the model described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) to make the report described in Section 53H-8-303 for determining an institution's performance funding.(5)(6)At the end of each five-year period for which the board sets goals under Subsection (1)(a)(ii):(a)the board shall:(i)review the Utah System of Higher Education's performance in meeting the goals the board sets under Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A);(ii)review each institution's performance in meeting the goals the board sets under Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (1)(a)(ii)(D); and(iii)allocate any funds not allocated under Subsection 53H-8-303(6)(d) to each institution that meets or exceeds the goals the board sets under Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (1)(a)(ii)(D); and(b)the Legislature may appropriate additional funds for the board to allocate to each institution that meets or exceeds goals as described in Subsection (5)(a)(iii)(6)(a)(iii).(6)(7)In year two or three of each five-year period for which the board sets goals under Subsection (1)(a)(ii), the following committees and the governor shall hold a joint open meeting to review the goals the board sets under Subsection (1)(a)(ii):(a)the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee; and(a)(b)after the meeting described in Subsection (7)(a), the Executive Appropriations Committee;.(b)the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee; and(c)the Education Interim Committee.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53H-8-305 is amended to read:53H-8-305Effective 07/01/26Repealed 07/01/27. Five-year performance goals.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Access metric" means the metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(i).(b)"Award" means a degree or certificate that an institution grants.(c)"Cohort" means a group of students, defined by the year in which the group enrolls in an institution.(d)"Five-year performance period" means the five-year period beginning on July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2027.(e)(a)"High-yield award" means the same as that term is defined in board policy under Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(c)53H-8-304(3).(f)"High-yield awards metric" means the metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(iii).(g)"Standard completion time" means the time in which a student typically completes an award program.(h)(b)"System" means the Utah System of Higher Education.(i)"Timely completion metric" means the metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(ii).(2)(a)The goals established by the board establishes in accordance with Subsection 53H-8-304(1)(a)(ii) for the Utah System of Higher Education for the five-year performance period beginning on July 1, 2022, and ending on June 30, 2027, are:(a)(i)for the access metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(i), to increase the percent of Utah high school graduates participating in the system by 3.0%;(b)(ii)for the timely completion metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(ii), to increase the system percentage of a cohort that completes an award in up to and including 1.5 times the standard completion timetime in which a student typically completes an award program by 3.0%; and(c)(iii)for the high-yield awards metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a)(iii), to increase the system percentage of high-yield awards by 3.0%.(b)The board shall ensure that the goals the board establishes in accordance with Subsection 53H-8-304(1)(a)(ii)(D) for the five-year performance period beginning on July 1, 2027, and ending on June 30, 2032, are:(i)for the workforce responsiveness metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(i)(A), to:(A)increase the number of degrees and certificates an institution awards that map to high-demand jobs in the state by at least 1.0% each year; or(B)maintain the number described in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A) at or above 80%;(ii)for the institutional efficiency metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(i)(B), to increase the five-year rolling average number of degrees and certificates an institution awards per full-time equivalent student by at least 1.0% each year;(iii)for the timely completion metric for degree-granting institutions described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(ii)(B), to:(A)increase the percentage of timely completion at the institution by at least 1.0% each year; or(B)maintain the percentage described in Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(A) at or above 75%;(iv)for the regional university and community college first-year student metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(iii)(B), to increase the number of students achieving the student's first 30 credit hours by at least 1.0% each year;(v)for the research university research expenditure metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(iv)(B), to increase the total number of research dollars the university expended by at least 1.0% more than the year-over change in the Consumer Price Index that the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics reports; and(vi)for the technical college placement metric described in Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(b)(v)(B), to increase the placement rate of graduates in jobs or degree-granting programs by at least 1.0% each year.(3)In order to meet the system goals described in Subsection (2)(2)(a), the goals for each institution for the five-year performance period are:(a)for the access metric, to increase the institution's share of Utah high school graduates participating in the system by a percentage that the board determines;(b)for the timely completion metric, to increase the percent of a cohort enrolled at the institution that completes an award in up to and including 1.5 times the standard completion time or sooner by a percentage that the board determines; and(c)for the high-yield awards metric, to increase the percent of high-yield awards the institution grants by a percentage that the board determines.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53H.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)Subsection 53H-8-202(2)(b)(v), regarding enrollment funding, is repealed July 1, 2031.(50)Section 53H-8-211, Enrollment funding, is repealed July 1, 2031.(51)Subsection 53H-8-304(2)(a), regarding performance funding metrics for the five-year period ending June 30, 2027, is repealed July 1, 2028.(52)Subsection 53H-8-305(2)(a), regarding performance funding goals for the five-year period ending June 30, 2027, is repealed July 1, 2028.(53)Subsection 53H-8-305(3)(a), regarding performance funding goals for the five-year period ending June 30, 2027, is repealed July 1, 2028.(49)(54)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(55)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 8:
Section 8.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.